District of Columbia statutes.
47-1342.01

Bid off property.

Whenever payment by check or other instrument on behalf of a real property is received prior to the tax sale, and the payment is refused by the drawee or the funds are not collected by the District, and, due to the tender of payment, the real property is not presented at the tax sale, the real property shall be deemed bid off to the District under § 47-1352 and may be subsequently sold under § 47-1353.

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(cc), 50 DCR 896
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 12(hh) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 12(hh) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(gg) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(hh) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12(hh) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).